District of Columbia statutes.
24-263.04

Operator-assisted calls.

The Public Service Commission shall determine the maximum rate for operator-assisted calls made from phones utilized by inmates of a penal or correctional institution in the District of Columbia.

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-280, § 5, 48 DCR 1885